District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.12

Effect of transfer on death deed during transferor’s life.

During a transferor’s life, a transfer on death deed does not:

(1)

Affect an interest or right of the transferor or any other owner, including the right to transfer or encumber the property;

(2)

Affect an interest or right of a transferee, even if the transferee has actual or constructive notice of the deed;

(3)

Affect an interest or right of a secured or unsecured creditor or future creditor of the transferor, even if the creditor has actual or constructive notice of the deed;

(4)

Affect the transferor’s or designated beneficiary’s eligibility for any form of public assistance;

(5)

Create a legal or equitable interest in favor of the designated beneficiary; or

(6)

Subject the property to claims or process of a creditor of the designated beneficiary.

History

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606